Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
B. Reports

§ 17-19-1620.
Financial statements for members.

Except as provided in the articles or bylaws of a religious corporation, a corporation upon written demand from a member shall furnish that member its latest annual financial statements, which may be consolidated or combined statements of the corporation and one (1) or more of its subsidiaries or affiliates, as appropriate, that include a balance sheet as of the end of the fiscal year and statement of operations for that year. If financial statements are prepared for the corporation on the basis of generally accepted accounting principles, the annual financial statements shall also be prepared on that basis.

If annual financial statements are reported upon by a public accountant, the accountant’s report shall accompany them. If not, the statements shall be accompanied by the statement of the president or the person responsible for the corporation’s financial accounting records:

Stating the president’s or other person’s reasonable belief as to whether the statements were prepared on the basis of generally accepted accounting principles and, if not, describing the basis of preparation; and

Describing any respects in which the statements were not prepared on a basis of accounting consistent with the statements prepared for the preceding year.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-1621.
Report of indemnification to members.

If a corporation indemnifies or advances expenses to a director under W.S.

17-19-852

,

17-19-853

or

17-19-854

in connection with a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation, the corporation shall report the indemnification or advance in writing to the members with or before the notice of the next meeting of members.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.